Louisiana, session 2026, HB551.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1309(J)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1309. Early voting; verification
* * *
J.(1) Upon approval of the secretary of state, a registrar of voters may utilize
commissioners selected and trained by the registrar of voters to assist the registrar
during the early voting period in the conduct of early voting by his office, including
conducting the nursing home early voting program pursuant to R.S. 18:1333. A
registrar of voters shall, in seeking the approval of the secretary of state, indicate to
the secretary the number of commissioners that is required for such assistance. A
commissioner who assists the registrar in the conduct of early voting shall take an
oath of office as a deputy registrar for the early voting period and shall complete an
affidavit prepared by the secretary of state that contains the name, address, and last
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 551 ENROLLED
four digits of the social security number of the early voting commissioner and an
acknowledgment that the law prohibits the disclosure of confidential voter
information listed in the precinct register or early voting list kept by the registrar.
The affidavit shall be retained in the office of the registrar of voters. A
commissioner who assists the registrar in the conduct of early voting shall be paid
one hundred fifty dollars for each day of such assistance. Commissioners shall also
be paid in accordance with R.S. 18:426.1(B), if applicable.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.